Hawaii statutes.
§84-15 Contracts. (a) A state agency
shall not enter into any contract to procure or dispose of goods or services,
or for construction, with a legislator, an employee, or a business in which a
legislator or an employee has a controlling interest, involving services or
property of a value in excess of $10,000 unless:

(1) The contract is awarded by competitive sealed
bidding pursuant to section 103D-302;

(2) The contract is awarded by competitive sealed
proposal pursuant to section 103D-303; or

(3) The agency posts a notice of its intent to award
the contract and files a copy of the notice with the state ethics commission at
least ten days before the contract is awarded.

(b) A state agency shall not enter into a
contract with any person or business which is represented or assisted
personally in the matter by a person who has been an employee of the agency
within the preceding two years and who participated while in state office or
employment in the matter with which the contract is directly concerned. This
subsection shall not apply to any contract that is awarded in accordance with
subsection (a) with a person or business represented or assisted by a person
who was a member of a task force or served as the designee or representative of
a task force member. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1; am L 1978, c 245, §3; gen ch
1985; am L 1989, c 226, §1; am L 1995, c 178, §2; am L 2012, c 208, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next